Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0097.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 22. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this act, a person that violates this act, or that maintains a fire hazard in violation of this act or a rule promulgated under this act, is guilty of a misdemeanor. In addition, the owner of a firm or vehicle operated in this state that is operated in violation of this act or a rule promulgated under this act must pay a civil fine of $200.00, if the violation creates a fire hazard or a likelihood that hazardous material will be released. Each civil fine collected must be deposited in the general fund of this state. (2) A member of the board who intentionally violates section 3b(6) is subject to the penalties prescribed under the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (3) If the board arbitrarily and capriciously violates section 3b(9) the board is subject to the penalties prescribed in the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (4) A labeled fire door assembly with a temporary door locking device or system that is installed in accordance with section 4i of the Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1504i, or section 1d of 1937 PA 306, MCL 388.851d, does not violate this act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 96. (b) Senate Bill No. 98. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor